Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
ARTICLE 12
ANNEXATION - CONSOLIDATION - DISCONNECTION

Section

PART 1 MUNICIPAL ANNEXATION
ACT OF 1965

PART 2 ANNEXATION OF ADJACENT AREA
UPON REORGANIZATION

PART 3 DISSOLUTION AND ANNEXATION
(SPECIAL CHARTERS)

PART 4 CONSOLIDATION AND ANNEXATION -
STATUTORY CITIES AND TOWNS

PART 5 DISCONNECTION BY ORDINANCE -
STATUTORY CITIES AND TOWNS

PART 6 DISCONNECTION BY COURT DECREE -
STATUTORY CITIES

PART 7 DISCONNECTION BY COURT DECREE -
STATUTORY TOWNS